New York, session 2025-2026, A3396.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 2851 of the education law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 3 (d) Notwithstanding any provision of this subdivision or any other law 4 to the contrary, an application for the conversion of an existing public 5 school to a charter school shall not be approved or issued to any school 6 that demonstrates or has demonstrated a practice or pattern of egregious 7 or intentional violation of subdivision one of section two hundred 8 nine-a of the civil service law, as determined by the public employment 9 relations board, involving interference with or discrimination against 10 employee rights under article fourteen of the civil service law, 11 provided, however, nothing herein shall preclude an applicant from 12 submitting an application pursuant to the provisions of this section at 13 any future time. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02054-01-5